fixer/src/main/resources/la/la/universal/la.aff
SFX A Y 1104
SFX A o       o               o         
SFX A o       oque            o         
SFX A o       oqve            o         
SFX A o       one             o         
SFX A o       ove             o         
SFX A o       oue             o           
SFX A o       as              o         
SFX A o       asque           o         
SFX A o       asqve           o         
SFX A o       asne            o         
SFX A o       asve            o         
SFX A o       asue            o           
SFX A o       at              o         
SFX A o       atque           o         
SFX A o       atqve           o         
SFX A o       atne            o         
SFX A o       atve            o         
SFX A o       atue            o           
SFX A o       amus            o         
SFX A o       amvs            o         
SFX A o       amusque         o         
SFX A o       amvsqve         o         
SFX A o       amusne          o         
SFX A o       amvsne          o         
SFX A o       amusve          o         
SFX A o       amusue          o           
SFX A o       amvsve          o         
SFX A o       atis            o         
SFX A o       atisque         o         
SFX A o       atisqve         o         
SFX A o       atisne          o         
SFX A o       atisve          o         
SFX A o       atisue          o           
SFX A o       ant             o         
SFX A o       antque          o         
SFX A o       antqve          o         
SFX A o       antne           o         
SFX A o       antve           o         
SFX A o       antue           o           
SFX A o       abam            o         
SFX A o       abamque         o         
SFX A o       abamqve         o         
SFX A o       abamne          o         
SFX A o       abamve          o         
SFX A o       abamue          o           
SFX A o       abas            o         
SFX A o       abasque         o         
SFX A o       abasqve         o         
SFX A o       abasne          o         
SFX A o       abasve          o         
SFX A o       abasue          o           
SFX A o       abat            o         
SFX A o       abatque         o         
SFX A o       abatqve         o         
SFX A o       abatne          o         
SFX A o       abatve          o         
SFX A o       abatue          o           
SFX A o       abamus          o         
SFX A o       abamvs          o         
SFX A o       abamusque       o         
SFX A o       abamvsqve       o         
SFX A o       abamusne        o         
SFX A o       abamvsne        o         
SFX A o       abamusve        o         
SFX A o       abamusue        o           
SFX A o       abamvsve        o         
SFX A o       abatis          o         
SFX A o       abatisque       o         
SFX A o       abatisqve       o         
SFX A o       abatisne        o         
SFX A o       abatisve        o         
SFX A o       abatisue        o          
SFX A o       abant           o         
SFX A o       abantque        o         
SFX A o       abantqve        o         
SFX A o       abantne         o         
SFX A o       abantve         o         
SFX A o       abantue         o           
SFX A o       abo             o         
SFX A o       aboque          o         
SFX A o       aboqve          o         
SFX A o       abone           o         
SFX A o       above           o         
SFX A o       aboue           o           
SFX A o       abis            o         
SFX A o       abisque         o         
SFX A o       abisqve         o         
SFX A o       abisne          o         
SFX A o       abisve          o         
SFX A o       abisue          o           
SFX A o       abit            o         
SFX A o       abitque         o         
SFX A o       abitqve         o         
SFX A o       abitne          o         
SFX A o       abitve          o         
SFX A o       abitue          o           
SFX A o       abimus          o         
SFX A o       abimvs          o         
SFX A o       abimusque       o         
SFX A o       abimvsqve       o         
SFX A o       abimusne        o         
SFX A o       abimvsne        o         
SFX A o       abimusve        o         
SFX A o       abimusue        o           
SFX A o       abimvsve        o         
SFX A o       abitis          o         
SFX A o       abitisque       o         
SFX A o       abitisqve       o         
SFX A o       abitisne        o         
SFX A o       abitisve        o         
SFX A o       abitisue        o           
SFX A o       abunt           o         
SFX A o       abvnt           o         
SFX A o       abuntque        o         
SFX A o       abvntqve        o         
SFX A o       abuntne         o         
SFX A o       abvntne         o         
SFX A o       abuntve         o         
SFX A o       abuntue         o           
SFX A o       abvntve         o         
SFX A o       em              o         
SFX A o       emque           o         
SFX A o       emqve           o         
SFX A o       emne            o         
SFX A o       emve            o         
SFX A o       emue            o           
SFX A o       es              o         
SFX A o       esque           o         
SFX A o       esqve           o         
SFX A o       esne            o         
SFX A o       esve            o         
SFX A o       esue            o           
SFX A o       et              o         
SFX A o       etque           o         
SFX A o       etqve           o         
SFX A o       etne            o         
SFX A o       etve            o         
SFX A o       etue            o           
SFX A o       emus            o         
SFX A o       emvs            o         
SFX A o       emusque         o         
SFX A o       emvsqve         o         
SFX A o       emusne          o         
SFX A o       emvsne          o         
SFX A o       emusve          o         
SFX A o       emusue          o           
SFX A o       emvsve          o         
SFX A o       etis            o         
SFX A o       etisque         o         
SFX A o       etisqve         o         
SFX A o       etisne          o         
SFX A o       etisve          o         
SFX A o       etisue          o           
SFX A o       ent             o         
SFX A o       entque          o         
SFX A o       entqve          o         
SFX A o       entne           o         
SFX A o       entve           o         
SFX A o       entue           o           
SFX A o       arem            o         
SFX A o       aremque         o         
SFX A o       aremqve         o         
SFX A o       aremne          o         
SFX A o       aremve          o         
SFX A o       aremue          o           
SFX A o       ares            o         
SFX A o       aresque         o         
SFX A o       aresqve         o         
SFX A o       aresne          o         
SFX A o       aresve          o         
SFX A o       aresue          o           
SFX A o       aret            o         
SFX A o       aretque         o         
SFX A o       aretqve         o         
SFX A o       aretne          o         
SFX A o       aretve          o         
SFX A o       aretue          o           
SFX A o       aremus          o         
SFX A o       aremvs          o         
SFX A o       aremusque       o         
SFX A o       aremvsqve       o         
SFX A o       aremusne        o         
SFX A o       aremvsne        o         
SFX A o       aremusve        o         
SFX A o       aremusue        o           
SFX A o       aremvsve        o         
SFX A o       aretis          o         
SFX A o       aretisque       o         
SFX A o       aretisqve       o         
SFX A o       aretisne        o         
SFX A o       aretisve        o         
SFX A o       aretisue        o           
SFX A o       arent           o         
